Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-139
Retail licenses to restaurants and
clubs; conditions.

No person shall receive a retail license
to sell alcoholic liquor upon any premises used as a restaurant or as a club
unless such premises or plan of operation strictly complies with sections
53-103.09 and 53-103.30.

Laws 1935, c. 116, § 93, p. 425;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 53-393;

R.S.1943, § 53-139;

Laws 1989, LB 441, § 6;

Laws 1994, LB 859, § 6;

Laws 2010, LB861, § 71.